Colorado, session 2026A, HB1351.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.9-209, add (3)
as follows:
22-82.9-209. Program - funding - repeal.
(3) (a) ON JULY 1, 2026, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL TRANSFER
THIRTY-ONE MILLION SIXTY-SIX THOUSAND EIGHT HUNDRED THIRTY-ONE
DOLLARS FROM THE HEALTHY SCHOOL MEALS FOR ALL PROGRAM CASH FUND
TO THE STATE EDUCATION FUND.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (3) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-82.9-211, amend
(4.5)(a), (4.5)(b), and (4.5)(c); and repeal (8) as follows:
22-82.9-211. Healthy school meals for all program cash fund -
creation - uses - reporting requirements - legislative declaration -
definitions - repeal.
(4.5) (a) On July 1, 2026 JULY 1, 2028, and each July 1 thereafter,
the state treasurer shall transfer an amount from the state education fund to
the account equal to the amount reported by the office of state planning and
budgeting pursuant to subsection (4.5)(b) of this section.
(b) Before July 1, 2026 JULY 1, 2028, and before each July 1
thereafter, the office of state planning and budgeting shall, in collaboration
with the department of revenue, prepare an estimate of the amount of state
education fund healthy school meals for all revenue for the following fiscal
year and report that estimate to the state treasurer.
(c) (I) On July 1, 2026 JULY 1, 2028, in addition to the amount
described in subsection (4.5)(a) of this section, the state treasurer shall
transfer an amount from the state education fund to the fund equal to the
amount reported by the office of state planning and budgeting pursuant to
subsection (4.5)(c)(II) of this section.
(II) Before July 1, 2026 JULY 1, 2028, the office of state planning
and budgeting shall, in collaboration with the department of revenue,
prepare an estimate of the amount of state education fund healthy school
meals for all revenue for the immediately preceding fiscal year and report
that estimate to the state treasurer.
(8) (a) On or before January 15, 2027, the department, in
consultation with the office of state planning and budgeting, shall report to
the joint budget committee of the general assembly on whether there is a
sufficient balance in the cash fund for:
(I) The state treasurer to transfer an amount from the cash fund to
the state education fund equal to the total amount of expenditures from the
state education fund for the purposes of subsection (3) of this section minus
the amount of additional tax revenue deposited in the state education fund
as a result of section 39-22-104 (3)(p.5) for state fiscal years 2022-23,
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1351

2023-24, 2024-25, and 2025-26; and
(II) The department to provide reimbursements to a participating
school food authority for offering eligible meals without charge pursuant to
section 22-82.9-204 (1).
(b) This subsection (8) is repealed, effective July 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1351

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1351